District of Columbia statutes.
3-1328

Persons ineligible for suppliers’ license.

(a)

The Board, in its discretion, may determine the following persons not to be eligible to receive a suppliers’ license: A person convicted of a felony who either has not received a pardon or has not been released from parole or probation for at least 5 years; a person who is or has been a professional gambler or gambling promoter; a public officer or employee; or a business in which a person disqualified under provisions of this section is employed or active or in which a person is married to, in a domestic partnership with, or related in the 1st degree of kinship to, such person who has an interest of more than 10 percent in the business.

(b)

For the purposes of this section, the term “domestic partnership” shall have the same meaning as provided in § 32-701(4).

History

Mar. 10, 1981, D.C. Law 3-172, § 4, 27 DCR 4736
Sept. 12, 2008, D.C. Law 17-231, § 11(b), 55 DCR 6758
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 31, 59 DCR 6190

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-2528.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 17-231, designated subsec. (a); in subsec. (a), substituted “married to, in a domestic partnership with,” for “married”; and added subsec. (b).
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-171 added a comma following “kinship to” in (a).